Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 13 ALCOHOL AND DRUG OFFENSES
42-4-1301.3. Alcohol and drug driving safety program - definition.

Upon conviction of a violation of section 42-4-1301, the court shall sentence the defendant in accordance with the provisions of this section and other applicable provisions of this part 13. The court shall consider the alcohol and drug evaluation required pursuant to this section prior to sentencing; except that the court may proceed to immediate sentencing without considering such alcohol and drug evaluation:

If the defendant has no prior convictions or pending charges under this section; or

If the defendant has one or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney and the defendant have stipulated to such conviction or convictions; and

If neither the defendant nor the prosecuting attorney objects.

If the court proceeds to immediate sentencing, without considering an alcohol and drug evaluation, the alcohol and drug evaluation shall be conducted after sentencing, and the court shall order the defendant to complete the education and treatment program recommended in the alcohol and drug evaluation. If the defendant disagrees with the education and treatment program recommended in the alcohol and drug evaluation, the defendant may request the court to hold a hearing to determine which education and treatment program should be completed by the defendant.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1268), ch. 267, p. 1217, § 1, effective June 2, 2011.)

The judicial department shall administer in each judicial district an alcohol and drug driving safety program that provides presentence and postsentence alcohol and drug evaluations on all persons convicted of a violation of section 42-4-1301. The alcohol and drug driving safety program shall further provide supervision and monitoring of all such persons whose sentences or terms of probation require completion of a program of alcohol and drug driving safety education or treatment.

The presentence and postsentence alcohol and drug evaluations shall be conducted by such persons determined by the judicial department to be qualified to provide evaluation and supervision services as described in this section.

An alcohol and drug evaluation shall be conducted on all persons convicted of a violation of section 42-4-1301, and a copy of the report of the evaluation shall be provided to such person. The report shall be made available to and shall be considered by the court prior to sentencing unless the court proceeds to immediate sentencing pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

The report shall contain the defendant's prior traffic record, characteristics and history of alcohol or drug problems, and amenability to rehabilitation. The report shall include a recommendation as to alcohol and drug driving safety education or treatment for the defendant.

The alcohol evaluation shall be conducted and the report prepared by a person who is trained and knowledgeable in the diagnosis of chemical dependency. Such person's duties may also include appearing at sentencing and probation hearings as required, referring defendants to education and treatment agencies in accordance with orders of the court, monitoring defendants in education and treatment programs, notifying the probation department and the court of any defendant failing to meet the conditions of probation or referral to education or treatment, appearing at revocation hearings as required, and providing assistance in data reporting and program evaluation.

For the purpose of this section, "alcohol and drug driving safety education or treatment" means either level I or level II education or treatment programs approved by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services. Level I programs are short-term, didactic education programs. Level II programs are therapeutically oriented education, long-term outpatient, and comprehensive residential programs. The court shall instruct a defendant sentenced to level I or level II programs to meet all financial obligations of the programs. If the financial obligations are not met, the program shall notify the sentencing court for the purpose of collection or review and further action on the defendant's sentence. Nothing in this section prohibits treatment agencies from applying to the state for money to recover the costs of level II treatment for defendants determined indigent by the court.

There is created an alcohol and drug driving safety program fund in the office of the state treasurer, referred to in this subsection (4) as the "fund". The fund consists of money deposited in it as directed by this subsection (4)(a). The assessment in effect on July 1, 1998, remains in effect unless the judicial department and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services have provided the general assembly with a statement of the cost of the program, including costs of administration for the past and current fiscal year to include a proposed change in the assessment. The general assembly shall then consider the proposed new assessment and approve the amount to be assessed against each person during the following fiscal year in order to ensure that the alcohol and drug driving safety program established in this section is financially self-supporting. Any adjustment in the amount to be assessed must be noted in the appropriation to the judicial department and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services as a footnote or line item related to this program in the general appropriation bill. The state auditor shall periodically audit the costs of the programs to determine that they are reasonable and that the rate charged is accurate based on these costs. Any other fines, fees, or costs levied against a person are not part of the program fund. The court shall transmit to the state treasurer the amount assessed for the alcohol and drug evaluation to be credited to the fund. Fees charged pursuant to section 27-81-106 (1) to approved alcohol and drug treatment facilities that provide level I and level II programs as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the fund. Upon appropriation by the general assembly, the money must be expended by the judicial department and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services for the administration of the alcohol and drug driving safety program. In administering the alcohol and drug driving safety program, the judicial department is authorized to contract with any agency for any services the judicial department deems necessary. Money deposited in the fund remains in the fund to be used for the purposes set forth in this section and must not revert or transfer to the general fund except by further act of the general assembly.

The judicial department shall ensure that qualified personnel are placed in the judicial districts. The judicial department and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services shall jointly develop and maintain criteria for evaluation techniques, treatment referral, data reporting, and program evaluation.

The alcohol and drug driving safety program shall cooperate in providing services to a defendant who resides in a judicial district other than the one in which the arrest was made. Alcohol and drug driving safety programs may cooperate in providing services to any defendant who resides at a location closer to another judicial district's program. The requirements of this section shall not apply to persons who are not residents of Colorado at the time of sentencing.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) to the contrary, on March 5, 2003, the state treasurer shall deduct one million dollars from the alcohol and drug driving safety program fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

The provisions of this section are also applicable to any defendant who receives a diversion in accordance with section 18-1.3-101, C.R.S., or who receives a deferred sentence in accordance with section 18-1.3-102, C.R.S., and the completion of any stipulated alcohol evaluation, level I or level II education program, or level I or level II treatment program to be completed by the defendant shall be ordered by the court in accordance with the conditions of such deferred prosecution or deferred sentence as stipulated to by the prosecution and the defendant.

An approved alcohol or drug treatment facility that provides level I or level II programs as provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section shall not require a person to repeat any portion of an alcohol and drug driving safety education or treatment program that he or she has successfully completed while he or she was imprisoned for the current offense.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 1907, § 3, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1561, § 368, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(d) added, p. 459, § 22, effective March 5.

L. 2010:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 808, § 87, effective April 29; IP(2)(a)(I) amended and (6) added, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1159, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 11-1268), ch. 267, p. 1217, § 1, effective June 2; (3)(c)(IV) and (4)(b) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1182, § 110, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(5) amended, (HB 13-1156), ch. 336, p. 1960, § 13, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(3)(c)(IV), (4)(a), and (4)(b) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1259, § 25, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1417, § 56, effective July 13.

42-4-1301.4. Useful public service - definitions - local programs - assessment of costs.

This section applies to any person convicted of a violation of section 42-4-1301 and who is ordered to complete useful public service.

For the purposes of this section and section 42-4-1301, "useful public service" means any work that is beneficial to the public and involves a minimum of direct supervision or other public cost. "Useful public service" does not include any work that would endanger the health or safety of any person convicted of a violation of any of the offenses specified in section 42-4-1301.

The sentencing court, the probation department, the county sheriff, and the board of county commissioners shall cooperate in identifying suitable work assignments. An offender sentenced to such work assignment shall complete the same within the time established by the court.

There may be established in the probation department of each judicial district in the state a useful public service program under the direction of the chief probation officer. It is the purpose of the useful public service program: To identify and seek the cooperation of governmental entities and political subdivisions thereof, as well as corporations organized not for profit or charitable trusts, as specified in subsection (3)(c) of this section, for the purpose of providing useful public service jobs; to interview and assign persons who have been ordered by the court to perform useful public service to suitable useful public service jobs; and to monitor compliance or noncompliance of such persons in performing useful public service assignments within the time established by the court.

Nothing in this subsection (3) limits the authority of an entity that is the recipient of community or useful public service to accept or reject such service, in its sole discretion.

In addition to governmental entities and political subdivisions thereof, the following organizations are eligible to provide community or useful public service jobs established under this section or any other provision of law so long as they meet any other requirement related to the provision of those jobs, as established by the entity that is the recipient of community or useful public service:

A charitable trust or other organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended;

A civic league or organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501 (c)(4) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and that also would qualify as a veterans' service organization as defined in section 501 (c)(19) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended; and

A veterans' service organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501 (c)(19) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Any general public liability insurance policy obtained pursuant to this section shall be in a sum of not less than the current limit on government liability under the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

For the purposes of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., "public employee" does not include any person who is sentenced pursuant to section 42-4-1301 to participate in any type of useful public service.

No governmental entity shall be liable under the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S., or under the "Colorado Employment Security Act", articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S., for any benefits on account of any person who is sentenced pursuant to section 42-4-1301 to participate in any type of useful public service, but nothing in this paragraph (c) shall prohibit a governmental entity from electing to accept the provisions of the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado" by purchasing and keeping in force a policy of workers' compensation insurance covering such person.

In accordance with section 42-4-1307 (14), in addition to any other penalties prescribed in this part 13, the court shall assess an amount, not to exceed one hundred twenty dollars, upon any person required to perform useful public service. Such amount shall be used by the operating agency responsible for overseeing such person's useful public service program to pay the cost of administration of the program, a general public liability policy covering such person, and, if such person will be covered by workers' compensation insurance pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of this section or an insurance policy providing such or similar coverage, the cost of purchasing and keeping in force such insurance coverage. Such amount shall be adjusted from time to time by the general assembly in order to ensure that the useful public service program established in this section shall be financially self-supporting. The proceeds from such amounts shall be used by the operating agency only for defraying the cost of personal services and other operating expenses related to the administration of the program and the cost of purchasing and keeping in force policies of general public liability insurance, workers' compensation insurance, or insurance providing such or similar coverage and shall not be used by the operating agency for any other purpose.

The provisions of this section relating to the performance of useful public service are also applicable to any defendant who receives a diversion in accordance with section 18-1.3-101, C.R.S., or who receives a deferred sentence in accordance with section 18-1.3-102, C.R.S., and the completion of any stipulated amount of useful public service hours to be completed by the defendant shall be ordered by the court in accordance with the conditions of such deferred prosecution or deferred sentence as stipulated to by the prosecution and the defendant.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 1907, § 3, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 303, § 2, effective July 1; (6) amended, p. 1561, § 368, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 506, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2011:

(5) amended, (HB 11-1268), ch. 267, p. 1220, § 3, effective June 2; (5) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1183, § 111, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1156), ch. 336, p. 1960, § 14, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1056), ch. 56, p. 179, § 3, effective March 20.

42-4-1302. Stopping of suspect.

A law enforcement officer may stop any person who the officer reasonably suspects is committing or has committed a violation of section 42-4-1301 (1) or (2) and may require the person to give such person's name, address, and an explanation of his or her actions. The stopping shall not constitute an arrest.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2390, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1202.1 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1302 was relocated to § 42-4-1502.

Cross references:

For provision that the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians pursuant to this section apply upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state, see § 42-4-103 (2)(b).

42-4-1303. Records - prima facie proof.

Official records of the department of public health and environment relating to certification of breath test instruments, certification of operators and operator instructors of breath test instruments, certification of standard solutions, and certification of laboratories shall be official records of the state, and copies thereof, attested by the executive director of the department of public health and environment or the director's deputy and accompanied by a certificate bearing the official seal for said department that the executive director or the director's deputy has custody of said records, shall be admissible in all courts of record and shall constitute prima facie proof of the information contained therein. The department seal required under this section may also consist of a rubber stamp producing a facsimile of the seal stamped upon the document.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2816, § 595, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2390, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-4-1304. Samples of blood or other bodily substance - duties of department of public health and environment - rules.

The department of public health and environment shall establish a system for obtaining samples of blood or other bodily substance from the bodies of all pilots in command, vessel operators in command, or drivers and pedestrians fifteen years of age or older who die within four hours after involvement in a crash involving a motor vehicle, a vessel, or an aircraft. For purposes of this section, "vessel" has the meaning set forth in section 33-13-102, C.R.S. No person having custody of the body of the deceased shall perform any internal embalming procedure until a blood and urine specimen to be tested for alcohol, drug, and carbon monoxide concentrations has been taken by an appropriately trained person certified by the department of public health and environment. Whenever the driver of the vehicle cannot be immediately determined, the samples shall be obtained from all deceased occupants of the vehicle.

All samples so collected shall be placed in containers of a type designed to preserve the integrity of a sample from the time of collection until it is subjected to analysis.

All samples shall be tested and analyzed in the laboratories of the department of public health and environment, or in any other laboratory approved for this purpose by the department of public health and environment, to determine the amount of alcohol, drugs, and carbon monoxide contained in such samples or the amount of any other substance contained therein as deemed advisable by the department of public health and environment.

The state board of health shall establish and promulgate such administrative rules and procedures as are necessary to ensure that collection and testing of samples is accomplished to the fullest extent. Such rules and procedures shall include but not be limited to the following:

The certification of laboratories to ensure that the collection and testing of samples is performed in a competent manner, which may include waiving specific certification requirements for laboratories that are accredited by a nationally or internationally recognized accreditation organization that includes the scope of forensic toxicology; and

The designation of responsible state and local officials who shall have authority and responsibility to collect samples for testing.

All records of the results of such tests shall be compiled by the department of public health and environment and shall not be public information, but shall be disclosed on request to any interested party in any civil or criminal action arising out of the collision.

All state and local public officials, including investigating law enforcement officers, have authority to and shall follow the procedures established by the department of public health and environment pursuant to this section, including the release of all information to the department of public health and environment concerning such samples and the testing thereof. The Colorado state patrol and the county coroners and their deputies shall assist the department of public health and environment in the administration and collection of such samples for the purposes of this section.

The office of the highway safety coordinator, the department, the Colorado state patrol, and the division of criminal justice within the department of public safety have access to the results of the tests of samples taken as a result of a traffic crash for statistical analysis. The division of parks and wildlife has access to the results of the tests of samples taken as a result of a boating accident for statistical analysis.

Failure to perform the required duties as prescribed by this section and by the administrative regulations and procedures resulting therefrom shall be deemed punishable under section 18-8-405, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

(6) amended, p. 2816, § 596, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2391, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 652, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 14-1340), ch. 124, p. 442, § 3, effective April 18.

L. 2017:

(7) amended, (HB 17-1315), ch. 280, p. 1529, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

IP(4) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 18-1302), ch. 382, p. 2302, § 1, effective August 8.

42-4-1305. Open alcoholic beverage container - motor vehicle - prohibited.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alcoholic beverage" means a beverage as defined in 23 CFR 1270.3 (a).

"Motor vehicle" means a vehicle driven or drawn by mechanical power and manufactured primarily for use on public highways but does not include a vehicle operated exclusively on a rail or rails.

"Open alcoholic beverage container" means a bottle, can, or other receptacle that contains any amount of alcoholic beverage and:

That is open or has a broken seal; or

The contents of which are partially removed.

"Passenger area" means the area designed to seat the driver and passengers while a motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in his or her seating position, including but not limited to the glove compartment.

Except as otherwise permitted in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a person while in the passenger area of a motor vehicle that is on a public highway of this state or the right-of-way of a public highway of this state may not knowingly:

Drink an alcoholic beverage; or

Have in his or her possession an open alcoholic beverage container.

The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to:

Passengers, other than the driver or a front seat passenger, located in the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed, maintained, or used primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation;

The possession by a passenger, other than the driver or a front seat passenger, of an open alcoholic beverage container in the living quarters of a house coach, house trailer, motor home, as defined in section 42-1-102 (57), or trailer coach, as defined in section 42-1-102 (106)(a);

The possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in the area behind the last upright seat of a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk; or

The possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in an area not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger in a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

A person who violates the provisions of this subsection (2) commits a class A traffic infraction and shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and a surcharge of sixteen dollars as provided in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or limit the authority of any statutory or home rule town, city, or city and county to adopt ordinances that are no less restrictive than the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1187, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 969, § 95, effective August 5.

42-4-1305.5. Open marijuana container - motor vehicle - prohibited.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Marijuana" shall have the same meaning as in section 16 (2)(f) of article XVIII of the state constitution.

"Motor vehicle" means a vehicle driven or drawn by mechanical power and manufactured primarily for use on public highways but does not include a vehicle operated exclusively on a rail or rails.

"Open marijuana container" means a receptacle or marijuana accessory that contains any amount of marijuana and:

That is open or has a broken seal;

The contents of which are partially removed; and

There is evidence that marijuana has been consumed within the motor vehicle.

"Passenger area" means the area designed to seat the driver and passengers, including seating behind the driver, while a motor vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in his or her seating position, including but not limited to the glove compartment.

Except as otherwise permitted in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a person while in the passenger area of a motor vehicle that is on a public highway of this state or the right-of-way of a public highway of this state may not knowingly:

Use or consume marijuana; or

Have in his or her possession an open marijuana container.

The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to:

Passengers, other than the driver or a front seat passenger, located in the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed, maintained, or used primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation;

The possession by a passenger, other than the driver or a front seat passenger, of an open marijuana container in the living quarters of a house coach, house trailer, motor home, as defined in section 42-1-102 (57), or trailer coach, as defined in section 42-1-102 (106)(a);

The possession of an open marijuana container in the area behind the last upright seat of a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk; or

The possession of an open marijuana container in an area not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger in a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

A person who violates the provisions of this subsection (2) commits a class A traffic infraction and shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and a surcharge of seven dollars and eighty cents as provided in this section and section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or limit the authority of any statutory or home rule town, city, or city and county to adopt ordinances that are no less restrictive than the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-283), ch. 332, p. 1896, § 20, effective May 28.

L. 2014:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 14-129), ch. 387, p. 1937, § 3, effective June 6.

42-4-1306. Colorado task force on drunk and impaired driving - creation - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Drunk and impaired driving continues to cause needless deaths and injuries, especially among young people;

In 2003, there were over thirty thousand arrests for driving under the influence or driving while ability-impaired;

Although Colorado has taken many measures to reduce the incidents of drunk and impaired driving, the persistent regularity of these incidents continues to be a problem, as evidenced by the case of Sonja Marie Devries who was killed in 2004 by a drunk driver who had been convicted of drunk driving on six previous occasions; and

According to the federal national highway traffic safety administration, other states with a statewide task force on drunk and impaired driving have seen a decrease in incidents of drunk and impaired driving.

There is hereby created the Colorado task force on drunk and impaired driving, referred to in this section as the "task force". The task force shall meet regularly to investigate methods of reducing the incidents of drunk and impaired driving and develop recommendations for the state of Colorado regarding the enhancement of government services, education, and intervention to prevent drunk and impaired driving.

The task force shall consist of:

The executive director of the department of transportation or his or her designee who shall also convene the first meeting of the task force;

Three representatives appointed by the executive director of the department of revenue, with the following qualifications:

One representative with expertise in driver's license sanctioning;

One representative with expertise in enforcement of the state's liquor sales laws; and

One representative from the department of revenue's marijuana enforcement division;

The state court administrator or his or her designee;

The chief of the Colorado state patrol or his or her designee;

The state public defender or his or her designee;

Two representatives appointed by the executive director of the department of human services with the following qualifications:

One representative with expertise in substance abuse education and treatment for DUI or DWAI offenders; and

One representative with expertise in providing minors, adolescents, and juvenile offenders with substance abuse treatment and related services;

The director of the division of probation services or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of public health and environment, or his or her designee;

The following members selected by the member serving pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section:

A representative of a statewide association of chiefs of police with experience in making arrests for drunk or impaired driving;

A representative of a statewide organization of county sheriffs with experience in making arrests for drunk or impaired driving;

A victim or a family member of a victim of drunk or impaired driving;

A representative of a statewide organization of victims of drunk or impaired driving;

A representative of a statewide organization of district attorneys with experience in prosecuting drunk or impaired driving offenses;

A representative of a statewide organization of criminal defense attorneys with experience in defending persons charged with drunk or impaired driving offenses;

A representative of a statewide organization that represents persons who sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on premises;

(G.5) A representative of a statewide organization that represents persons who sell alcoholic beverages for consumption off premises;

A representative of a statewide organization that represents distributors of alcoholic beverages in Colorado;

A manufacturer of alcoholic beverages in Colorado;

A person under twenty-four years of age who is enrolled in a secondary or postsecondary school;

A representative of a statewide organization that represents alcohol and drug addiction counselors;

A representative of a statewide organization that represents persons licensed to sell retail marijuana for consumption off premises;

A community-based representative of the substance use disorder prevention field; and

A representative from the retail or medical marijuana industry who is an owner or manager of a retail dispensary;

The director of the peace officers standards and training board or the director's designee; and

A researcher who is appointed by a majority of the task force members and who specializes in drunk and impaired driving research.

Members selected pursuant to subparagraph (IX) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall serve terms of two years but may be selected for additional terms.

Members of the task force shall not be compensated for or reimbursed for their expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task force.

The initial meeting of the task force shall be convened on or before August 1, 2006, by the member serving pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3). At the first meeting, the task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair from the members serving pursuant to subparagraphs (I) to (VIII) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), who shall serve a term of two years but who may be reelected for additional terms.

The task force shall meet not less frequently than bimonthly and may adopt policies and procedures necessary to carry out its duties.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-093), ch. 41, p. 108, § 2, effective March 21, 2011.)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 566, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 2011:

(3) and (5) amended, (SB 11-093), ch. 41, p. 108, § 2, effective March 21.

L. 2014:

(1)(d), (2), (3)(a)(VI), IP(3)(a)(IX), (3)(a)(IX)(J), and (3)(a)(IX)(K) amended and (3)(a)(IX)(L), (3)(a)(X), and (3)(a)(XI) added, (HB 14-1321), ch. 369, p. 1760, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 798, § 121, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(4) repealed, (SB 17-231), ch. 174, p. 633, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(3)(a)(II), IP(3)(a)(IX), and (3)(a)(IX)(K) amended and (3)(a)(IX)(M) and (3)(a)(IX)(N) added, (HB 18-1362), ch. 311, p. 1872, § 1, effective August 8.